Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0871.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of
licensing and regulatory affairs for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 20.0
Full-time equated classified positions 1,796.0
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 634,378,600
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 30,303,000
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 604,075,600
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 30,661,000
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 295,025,800
State general fund/general purpose $ 278,388,800
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 20.0
Full-time equated classified positions 103.0
Unclassified salaries--FTEs 20.0 $ 3,176,100
Administrative services--FTEs 69.0 8,212,400
Executive director programs--FTEs 23.0 3,496,200
Property management 6,887,200
Worker's compensation 42,200
Regulatory effectiveness office--FTEs 11.0 1,716,500
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,530,600
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDIFS, accounting services 150,000
Federal revenues:
EPA, underground storage tanks 30,800
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


HHS-Medicaid, certification of health care
providers and suppliers 382,900
HHS-Medicare, certification of health care
providers and suppliers 636,700
Special revenue funds:
Aboveground storage tank fees 95,900
Accountancy enforcement fund 35,600
Boiler inspection fund 287,800
Builder enforcement fund 106,000
Construction code fund 828,800
Corporation fees 5,193,500
Elevator fees 318,900
Fire alarm fees 7,900
Fire safety standard and enforcement fund 2,300
Fire service fees 354,900
Fireworks safety fund 60,400
Health professions regulatory fund 1,906,300
Health systems fees 216,500
Licensing and regulation fund 854,700
Liquor license revenue 292,400
Liquor purchase revolving fund 3,206,700
Marihuana regulation fund 1,739,800
Marihuana regulatory fund 660,800
Michigan unarmed combat fund 5,800
Mobile home code fund 263,200
Nurse professional fund 42,400
PMECSEMA fund 50,100
Property development fees 7,800
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Public utility assessments 3,394,100
Real estate appraiser education fund 2,900
Real estate education fund 12,100
Real estate enforcement fund 12,400
Refined petroleum fund 155,300
Securities fees 1,528,500
Securities investor education and training fund 9,800
Security business fund 7,100
Survey and remonumentation fund 98,500
Tax tribunal fund 242,700
Utility consumer representation fund 55,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 273,100
Sec. 103. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Full-time equated classified positions 222.0
Public service commission--FTEs 222.0 $ 42,926,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 42,926,700
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
DOT, gas pipeline safety 2,704,600
Special revenue funds:
Public utility assessments 39,722,100
Civil fines, excavation and blasting 500,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 104. LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION
Full-time equated classified positions 148.0
Liquor licensing and enforcement--FTEs 148.0 $ 23,558,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 23,558,300
Appropriated from:
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Special revenue funds:
Direct shipper enforcement revolving fund 321,500
Liquor control enforcement and license
investigation revolving fund 175,000
Liquor license fee enhancement fund 76,400
Liquor license revenue 8,661,000
Liquor purchase revolving fund 14,324,400
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 105. OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION
Full-time equated classified positions 928.0
Bureau of community and health systems--FTEs 162.0 $ 27,808,400
Bureau of construction codes--FTEs 197.0 33,626,700
Bureau of fire services--FTEs 89.0 14,870,700
Bureau of professional licensing--FTEs 198.0 41,270,800
Bureau of survey and certification--FTEs 173.0 30,047,600
Corporations, securities, and commercial
licensing bureau--FTEs 109.0 17,799,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 165,423,200
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
Federal revenues:
DHS, fire training systems 528,000
DOT, hazardous materials training and planning 20,000
EPA, underground storage tanks 830,400
HHS-Medicaid, certification of health care
providers and suppliers 9,297,600
HHS-Medicare, certification of health care
providers and suppliers 14,941,500
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Federal funds 109,000
Special revenue funds:
Aboveground storage tank fees 352,200
Accountancy enforcement fund 1,227,900
Adult foster care facilities licenses fund 382,400
Boiler inspection fund 3,109,500
Builder enforcement fund 644,000
Construction code fund 14,009,000
Corporation fees 10,713,600
Division on deafness fund 73,400
Elevator fees 8,622,600
Fire alarm fees 137,900
Fire safety standard and enforcement fund 32,600
Fire service fees 3,218,300
Fireworks safety fund 1,269,800
Health professions regulatory fund 27,021,100
Health systems fees 4,237,500
Licensing and regulation fund 11,819,800
Liquor purchase revolving fund 225,000
Marihuana regulatory fund 500,000
Mobile home code fund 2,179,600
Nurse aide registration fund 1,712,100
Nurse professional fund 1,968,400
PMECSEMA fund 1,611,100
Property development fees 192,600
Real estate appraiser education fund 6,200
Real estate education fund 607,500
Real estate enforcement fund 758,900
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Refined petroleum fund 2,609,500
Securities fees 5,483,200
Securities investor education and training fund 504,200
Security business fund 184,700
Survey and remonumentation fund 916,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 33,365,900
Sec. 106. CANNABIS REGULATORY AGENCY
Full-time equated classified positions 182.0
Cannabis regulatory agency--FTEs 182.0 $ 31,609,900
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,609,900
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Industrial hemp licensing and registration fund 296,500
Marihuana registry fund 1,770,300
Marihuana regulation fund 22,078,600
Marihuana regulatory fund 7,464,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 0
Sec. 107. MICHIGAN OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS AND RULES
Full-time equated classified positions 172.0
Michigan office of administrative hearings and
rules--FTEs 172.0 $ 37,214,400
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,214,400
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG revenues, administrative hearings and rules 28,704,400
Special revenue funds:
Construction code fund 28,000
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Corporation fees 1,013,500
Health professions regulatory fund 886,700
Health systems fees 165,700
Licensing and regulation fund 914,300
Liquor purchase revolving fund 494,400
Marihuana regulation fund 254,200
Marihuana regulatory fund 100,200
Public utility assessments 2,997,400
Securities fees 1,057,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 598,400
Sec. 108. COMMISSIONS
Full-time equated classified positions 41.0
Michigan indigent defense commission--FTEs 21.0 $ 3,424,100
Michigan unarmed combat commission 126,200
Michigan Tax Tribunal--FTEs 20.0 4,611,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,161,500
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Michigan unarmed combat fund 126,200
Tax tribunal fund 822,100
Corporation fees 3,789,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,424,100
Sec. 109. DEPARTMENT GRANTS
Firefighter training grants $ 2,300,000
Liquor law enforcement grants 9,900,000
Marihuana operation and oversight grants 3,000,000
Michigan indigent defense commission grants 236,016,800
Remonumentation grants 6,800,000
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Utility consumer representation 3,100,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 261,116,800
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Fireworks safety fund 2,300,000
Liquor license revenue 9,900,000
Local indigent defense reimbursement 300,000
Marihuana regulation fund 3,000,000
Survey and remonumentation fund 6,800,000
Utility consumer representation fund 3,100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 235,716,800
Sec. 110. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 33,282,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 33,282,100
Appropriated from:
IDG revenues, administrative hearings and rules 1,448,600
Federal revenues:
DOT, gas pipeline safety 152,600
HHS-Medicaid, certification of health care
providers and suppliers 385,100
HHS-Medicare, certification of health care
providers and suppliers 641,800
Special revenue funds:
Aboveground storage tank fees 34,500
Accountancy enforcement fund 15,600
Boiler inspection fund 387,500
Construction code fund 1,384,900
Corporation fees 5,518,700
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Elevator fees 593,400
Fire safety standard and enforcement fund 4,500
Fire service fees 547,700
Fireworks safety fund 149,800
Health professions regulatory fund 4,330,200
Health systems fees 366,200
Industrial hemp licensing and registration fund 4,000
Licensing and regulation fund 805,400
Licensing license revenue 303,000
Liquor purchase revolving fund 5,311,200
Marihuana regulation fund 3,168,700
Marihuana regulatory fund 1,355,500
Mobile home code fund 253,000
Nurse aide registration fund 80,000
PMECSEMA fund 1,055,000
Public utility assessments 2,165,400
Real estate appraiser education fund 1,000
Real estate education fund 4,800
Real estate enforcement fund 7,700
Refined petroleum fund 235,200
Securities fees 470,600
Securities investor education and training fund 6,100
Survey and remonumentation fund 75,400
Tax tribunal fund 208,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 1,810,500
Sec. 111. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Bureau of fire services - smoke detectors $ 1,000,000
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Cannabis regulatory agency social equity
program 1,000,000
Michigan saves 1,500,000
Urban search and rescue 1,000,000
Real estate continuing education 400,000
Prosecuting attorneys coordinating council 2,655,100
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,555,100
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Corporation fees 2,500,000
Marihuana regulation fund 1,000,000
Real estate education fund 400,000
Prosecuting attorneys training fees 455,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 3,200,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is
$573,414,600.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid to
local units of government is $261,116,800.00. The itemized
statement below identifies appropriations from which spending to
local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS
Firefighter training grants $ 2,300,000
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Liquor law enforcement grants 9,900,000
Marihuana operation and oversight grants 3,000,000
Michigan indigent defense commission grants 236,016,800
Remonumentation grants 6,800,000
Utility consumer representation 3,100,000
TOTAL $ 261,116,800
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1:
(a) "Department" means the department of licensing and
regulatory affairs.
(b) "DHS" means the United States Department of Homeland
Security.
(c) "Director" means the director of the department.
(d) "DOT" means the United States Department of
Transportation.
(e) "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection
Agency.
(f) "FOIA" means the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442,
MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
(g) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(h) "HHS" means the United States Department of Health and
Human Services.
(i) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(j) "MDIFS" means the Michigan department of insurance and
financial services.
(k) "PMECSEMA" means pain management education and controlled
substances electronic monitoring and antidiversion.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(l) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house of
representatives subcommittees on the department, the senate and
house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the
state budget office.
(m) "Subcommittees" means the senate and house appropriations
subcommittees with jurisdiction over the budget for the department.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard report recipients and any other
required recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department for communicating with a
member of the legislature or legislative staff, unless the
communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising
its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside
this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department or agency shall submit the report to the
standard report recipients and to the house of representatives and
senate appropriations committees. The report must include all of
the following information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel
occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, local revenues, private revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
shall prepare and submit a report that provides for estimates of
the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and the chairpersons of the senate and house of
representatives appropriations committees.
Sec. 209. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $1,000,000.00 for
federal contingency funds. These funds are not available for
expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item
in this part under section 393(2) of the management and budget act,
1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $25,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency funds. These funds are not available for
expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item
in this part under section 393(2) of the management and budget act,
1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $200,000.00 for local
contingency funds. These funds are not available for expenditure
until they have been transferred to another line item in this part
under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private
contingency funds. These funds are not available for expenditure
until they have been transferred to another line item in this part
under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431,
MCL 18.1393.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


Sec. 210. A department or agency shall cooperate with the
department of technology, management, and budget to maintain a
searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that
includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for each
department or agency:
(a) Fiscal-year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal-year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal-year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 211. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate
and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 212. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations under part 1
shall take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically
disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform
contracts to provide services or supplies, or both. Each director
shall strongly encourage firms with which the department or agency
contracts to subcontract with certified geographically
disadvantaged business enterprises for services, supplies, or both.
As used in this section, "geographically disadvantaged business
enterprises" means that term as defined in Executive Directive No.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


2023-1.
Sec. 213. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report on
the number of full-time equated positions in pay status by civil
service classification, including a comparison by line item of the
number of full-time equated positions authorized from funds
appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated
positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting
period. The report must be submitted to the standard report
recipients and the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 214. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 215. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set by the
office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization and
occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
(3) The department shall adhere to the rules and regulations
of civil service, which state that the standard biweekly work
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


period for a full-time employee in the classified service is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 216. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal or state guidelines.
Sec. 217. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
that necessitates the change. The department shall submit the
report to the standard report recipients, the senate and house
appropriations committees, and the joint committee on
administrative rules.
Sec. 218. The department must provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients detailing federal policy changes that
do, or are expected to do, any of the following:
(a) Affect the operations of the department, including
reductions in federal revenue.
(b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group
regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the
department.
(c) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the
public.
Sec. 219. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of a local health officer.
Sec. 220. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 221. Not later than 6 months after a state budget office
issues work project letters, the department, or agency shall submit
an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts. The
report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 222. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2026 are estimated at $21,488,800.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $21,488,800.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.
Sec. 223. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 224. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 225. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees.
Sec. 227. (1) Not later than 30 days after enactment of this
act, the house of representatives and senate shall provide to the
state budget office a jointly agreed-upon list of legislatively
directed spending items funded in part 1 as defined in section 364
of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364. The list
must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded
items as publicly disclosed in accordance with sections 364 and
364a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364 and
18.364a.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 228. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial close out period.
Sec. 229. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-
2, must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and the
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.
Sec. 230. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar time frame as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
Sec. 252. (1) The department may charge registration fees to
attendees of informational, training, or special events that are
sponsored by the department and related to activities under the
department's purview.
(2) The registration fees must reflect the costs for the
department to sponsor the informational, training, or special
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


events.
(3) Revenue generated by the registration fees is appropriated
on receipt and may be expended by the department to cover the
department's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or
special events.
(4) Revenue generated by registration fees in excess of the
department's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or
special events carries forward to the subsequent fiscal year and
does not lapse to the general fund.
(5) The amount appropriated under subsection (3) must not
exceed $1,000,000.00.
Sec. 253. The department may provide to interested entities
otherwise unavailable customized listings of nonconfidential
information, such as the names and addresses of licensees, in the
department's possession. The department may establish and collect a
reasonable fee to provide this service. Revenue generated from this
service is appropriated on receipt and must be used to offset the
expenses of the service. Any balance of this revenue collected and
unexpended at the end of the fiscal year lapses to the appropriate
restricted fund.
Sec. 254. (1) The department shall sell documents at a price
not to exceed the cost of production and distribution. Money
received from the sale of these documents reverts to the
department. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds
received by the department under this subsection may be expended by
the department upon receipt by the department of treasury. This
subsection applies for only the following:
(a) Corporation and securities division documents, reports,
and papers required or permitted by law in accordance with section
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


1060(6) of the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.2060.
(b) The Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL
436.1101 to 436.2303.
(c) The mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301
to 125.2350; the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL
450.1101 to 450.2098; the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162,
MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192; and the uniform securities act (2002),
2008 PA 551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703.
(d) Construction code manuals.
(e) Copies of transcripts from administrative law hearings.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds
appropriated for the department under sections 57, 58, and 59 of
the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.257,
24.258, and 24.259, and section 203 of the legislative council act,
1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1203, are appropriated for all expenses
necessary to provide for the cost of publication and distribution.
(3) Unexpended funds at the end of the fiscal year carry
forward to the subsequent fiscal year and do not lapse to the
general fund.
Sec. 255. (1) Grants supported with private revenues received
by the department are appropriated on receipt and may be expended
by the department for the purposes specified within the grant
agreement and as permitted under state and federal law.
(2) Not later than 10 days after the receipt of a private
grant appropriated in subsection (1), the department shall notify
the chairpersons of the subcommittees, the senate and house fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office of the receipt of the grant,
including the fund source, purpose, and amount of the grant.
(3) The amount appropriated under subsection (1) must not
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


exceed $4,000,000.00.
Sec. 256. Unless prohibited by law, the department may accept
credit card or other electronic means of payment for licenses,
fees, or permits. Not later than February 1, the department shall
report on fees collected from credit card payments for licenses,
fees, and permits in the previous year.
Sec. 257. The department may carry into the succeeding fiscal
year unexpended federal pass-through funds to local institutions
and governments that do not require additional state matching
funds. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions and
governments that are received in amounts in addition to those
included in part 1 and that do not require additional state
matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended for the
federal pass-through funds. Not later than 14 days after the
receipt of federal pass-through funds, the department shall notify
the chairpersons of the subcommittees, the senate and house fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office of pass-through funds
appropriated under this section.
Sec. 258. (1) Not later than December 31, the department shall
submit a report that pertains to licensing and regulatory programs
overseen by the following agencies:
(a) Liquor control commission.
(b) Bureau of fire services.
(c) Corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau.
(d) Bureau of professional licensing.
(2) The report under subsection (1) must be in a format that
is consistent between the agencies listed in subsection (1) and
must provide, but is not limited to, the following information for
the previous fiscal year, as applicable, for each agency:
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(a) Revenue generated by and expenditures disbursed for each
regulatory fund.
(b) The renewal cycle and amount of each fee charged.
(c) Number of initial applications.
(d) Number of initial applications denied.
(e) Number of license renewals.
(f) Average amount of time to approve or deny completed
applications.
(g) Number of examinations proctored for initial applications.
(h) A description of the types of complaints received.
(i) A description of the process used to resolve complaints.
(j) Number of complaints received.
(k) Number of complaints investigated.
(l) Number of complaints closed with no action.
(m) Number of complaints resulting in administrative actions
or citations.
(n) Average amount of time to complete investigations.
(o) Number of enforcement actions, including license
revocations, suspensions, and fines.
(p) A description of the types of enforcement actions taken
against licensees.
(q) Number of administrative hearing adjudications.
(3) An agency listed in subsection (1)(a) or (b) shall report
by regulated activity and an agency listed in subsection (1)(c) or
(d) shall report by regulatory product or regulated activity, or
both.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Regulated activity" means the particular activities,
entities, facilities, and industries regulated by the agencies
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


specified in subsection (1).
(b) "Regulatory product" means each occupation, profession,
trade, or program, which includes licensure, certification,
registration, inspection, review, permitting, approval, or any
other regulatory service provided by the agencies specified in
subsection (1) for each regulated activity.
Sec. 260. Not later than March 30, the regulatory
effectiveness office shall submit a report to the standard report
recipients that includes the following information:
(a) Legislative recommendations for actions to take to improve
the effectiveness of licensing and regulation, including ideas that
make the licensing environment accessible to more consumers while
maintaining consumer protection.
(b) A plan from the department detailing actions needed to
improve licensing and regulatory effectiveness for consumers and
departmental actions, as well as detailed actions they have already
taken.
(c) The number of new licenses issued by category and number
of those applied in those categories.
(d) The average turnaround time, in days, for licenses by
category.
(e) A plan from the department detailing actions needed to
improve internal compliance, risk management, and departmental
actions, as well as detailed actions they have already taken.
Sec. 280. (1) The attorney general support fund is created
within the department of treasury.
(2) Any unexpended funds in the attorney general support fund
created in this section shall be carried forward and are available
for expenditure under this section.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(3) Funds may be spent from the attorney general support fund
only on appropriation, or legislative transfer pursuant to section
393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the attorney general support fund. The
state treasurer shall direct the investment of the attorney general
support fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the attorney
general support fund interest and earnings from the attorney
general support fund.
(5) Funds in the attorney general support fund at the close of
the fiscal year remain in the attorney general support fund and do
not lapse to the general fund.
(6) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(7) From fees authorized under section 1060 of the business
corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.2060, $8,112,200.00 is
appropriated to the attorney general support fund.
(8) From the attorney general support fund created in
subsection (1), $8,112,200.00 is appropriated.

PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
Sec. 301. (1) The public service commission administers the
low-income energy assistance grant program on behalf of the
Michigan department of health and human services via an interagency
agreement. Funds supporting the grant program are appropriated to
the department upon the awarding of grants and may be expended for
grant payments and administrative-related expenses incurred in the
operation of the grant program.
(2) No later than March 30, the public service commission
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


shall submit a report to the standard report recipients based on
the grants administered, including:
(a) Median annual household income for recipients of the
grant.
(b) Number of grants administered in each county of this
state.
Sec. 302. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
Michigan public service commission shall conduct at least 4 public
hearings in this state. Subject to the requirements of this
section, if there is a city in this state with a population between
195,000 and 700,000 according to the most recent federal decennial
census, a public hearing required under this section must be
conducted in that city.
(2) Not later than September 30, the Michigan public service
commission shall submit a report to the standard report recipients
that details the outcomes of the public hearings required under
this section and summarizes the public comments that were received
during the public hearings.
Sec. 303. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
Michigan public service commission, the department shall designate
1 FTE to assist consumers with utility issues, utility disruption,
or outages.
(2) On a monthly basis, the commission shall make the
following available on its website:
(a) The average electric rates for commission-regulated
electric utilities.
(b) A comparison of monthly residential electric bills for
commission-regulated electric utilities.
(c) The power supply cost recovery factors for all commission-
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


regulated electric utilities.
(d) The natural gas rates for commission-regulated natural gas
utilities.
(e) The gas cost recovery factors for commission-regulated
natural gas utilities.
(f) Monthly reliability data for commission-rate-regulated
electric utilities.
(g) The number of utility consumers assisted by the commission
for utility disruption, outages, and other utility issues.
(h) The number of formal complaints received in the month.

LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION
Sec. 401. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 from the
direct shipper enforcement revolving fund, the liquor control
commission shall expend the funds as required under section 203(11)
of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL
436.1203, to investigate and audit unlawful direct shipments of
wine by unlicensed wineries and retailers, with priority directed
toward unlicensed out-of-state retailers and third-party marketers.
In addition to other investigative methods, the commission shall
use shipping records available to the commission under section
203(21) of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58,
MCL 436.1203, to assist with the effort to investigate and audit
unlawful direct shipments of wine by unlicensed wineries and
retailers. The liquor control commission shall refer all identified
unlicensed out-of-state retailers and third-party marketers to the
attorney general.
(2) Not later than February 1, the liquor control commission
shall provide a report to the legislature and the standard report
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


recipients that details the commission's activities to investigate
and audit the illegal shipping of wine and the results of the
activities. The report must include all of the following:
(a) Work hours spent, specific actions performed, and the
number of full-time equated positions dedicated to identifying and
stopping unlicensed out-of-state retailers, third-party marketers,
and wineries that ship illegally in Michigan.
(b) General overview of expenditures associated with efforts
to identify and stop unlicensed out-of-state retailers, third-party
marketers, and wineries that ship illegally in this state.
(c) Number of out-of-state entities found to have illegally
shipped wine into this state and total number of 750 ml bottles,
number of cases with 750 ml bottles, number of liters, number of
gallons, or weight of illegally shipped wine. These items must be
itemized by total number of retailers and total number of wineries.
(d) Suggested areas of focus on how to address direct shipper
enforcement and illegal importation in the future.
(e) Number of unlicensed out-of-state entities found to have
illegally shipped wine into this state that were identified with
the shipping records described in subsection (1).
(f) Number of notices sent under subsection (3).
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 from the direct
shipper enforcement revolving fund, the liquor control commission
shall send a notice to each unlicensed out-of-state entity found to
have illegally shipped wine into this state. The notice must
include all of the following statements:
(a) That shipping wine into this state by unlicensed out-of-
state retailers and third-party marketers is illegal, and wineries
shipping into this state must obtain a direct shipper license.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(b) That under section 909 of the Michigan liquor control code
of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1909, making unlawful shipments of
wine into this state may be a felony punishable by imprisonment for
not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or
both.
(c) That the matter has been referred to the attorney general.

OCCUPATIONAL REGULATION
Sec. 501. The department shall not expend the funds
appropriated under this part and part 1 for the bureau of fire
services unless, in accordance with section 2c of the fire
prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.2c, inspection and plan review
fees are charged according to the following fee schedule:
Operation and maintenance inspection fee
Facility type Facility size Fee
Hospitals Any $8.00 per bed
Facility type Facility size Fee
Nursing Homes Any $5.00 per bed
Facility type Facility size Fee
Homes for the $5.00 per bed
Any
Aged
Facility type Facility size Fee
Adult Foster Care Greater than 6 $5.00 per bed
residents
Plan review and construction inspection fees for
hospitals and schools
Project cost range Fee
$101,000.00 or less minimum fee of $155.00
$101,001.00 to $1,500,000.00 $1.60 per $1,000.00
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


$1,500,001.00 to $10,000,000.00 $1.30 per $1,000.00
$10,000,001.00 or more $1.10 per $1,000.00
or a maximum fee of $60,000.00.
Sec. 502. The funds collected by the department for licenses,
permits, and other elevator regulation fees under the Michigan
Administrative Code and as determined under section 8 of 1976 PA
333, MCL 338.2158, and section 16 of 1967 PA 227, MCL 408.816, that
are unexpended at the end of the fiscal year carry forward to the
subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 503. Not later than February 15, the department shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients that provides all
of the following information:
(a) The number of veterans who were separated from service in
the Armed Forces of the United States with an honorable character
of service or under honorable conditions (general) character of
service, individually or if the veteran holds a majority interest
of a corporation or limited liability company, that were exempted
from paying licensure, registration, filing, or any other fees
collected under each licensure or regulatory program administered
by the bureau of construction codes, the bureau of professional
licensing, and the corporations, securities, and commercial
licensing bureau during the previous fiscal year.
(b) The specific fees and total amount of revenue exempted
under each licensure or regulatory program administered by the
bureau of construction codes, the bureau of professional licensing,
and the corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau
during the previous fiscal year.
(c) The actual costs of providing licensing and other
regulatory services to veterans exempted from paying licensure,
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


registration, filing, or any other fees during the previous fiscal
year and a description of how the actual costs were calculated.
(d) The estimated amount of revenue that will be exempted
under each licensure or regulatory program administered by the
bureau of construction codes, the bureau of professional licensing,
and the corporations, securities, and commercial licensing bureau
in both the current and subsequent fiscal years and a description
of how the exempted revenue was estimated.
Sec. 504. Revenue collected by the department for the bureau
of community and health systems from fees and collections that
exceeds the amount appropriated in part 1, the revenue must be
carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. The revenue
carried forward under this section must be used as the first source
of funds in the subsequent fiscal year.
Sec. 505. (1) To defray the costs associated with responding
to false final inspection appointments and to discourage the
practice of calling for final inspections when a project is
incomplete or noncompliant with a plan of correction previously
provided by the bureau of fire services, the bureau of fire
services may assess a fee of not more than $500.00 for responding
to a second or subsequent confirmed false inspection appointment.
Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
restricted account described in section 2c of the fire prevention
code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.2c, and explicitly identified within the
statewide integrated governmental management applications system.
(2) Not later than September 30, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients that provides all of the
following:
(a) The amount of the fee assessed under subsection (1).
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(b) The number of fees assessed and issued per region.
(c) The cost allocation for the work performed and reduced as
a result of this section.
(d) Any recommendations for consideration by the legislature.
Sec. 506. Not later than November 30, the department shall
submit a report to the standard report recipients on the Michigan
automated prescription system. The report must include, but is not
limited to, all of the following:
(a) The total number of licensed health professionals
registered to the Michigan automated prescription system.
(b) The total number of dispensers registered to the Michigan
automated prescription system.
(c) The total number of prescribers using the Michigan
automated prescription system.
(d) The total number of dispensers using the Michigan
automated prescription system.
(e) The total number of cases related to overprescribing,
overdispensing, and drug diversion where the department took
administrative action because of information and data generated
from the Michigan automated prescription system.
(f) The total number of hospitals, doctor's offices,
pharmacies, and other health facilities that have integrated the
Michigan automated prescription system into the facility's
electronic health records systems.
(g) The total number of delegate users registered to the
Michigan automated prescription system.
Sec. 507. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for bureau
of construction codes, not less than $900,000.00 must be allocated
for additional inspections and enforcement activities related to
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


the carnival-amusement safety act of 1966, 1966 PA 225, MCL 408.651
to 408.670, and the ski area safety act of 1962, 1962 PA 199, MCL
408.321 to 408.344.
(2) Not later than March 30, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients that details the
allocation of funds under this section. The report must include an
itemized listing of how the funds were used.
Sec. 508. (1) Funds remaining in the homeowner construction
lien recovery fund are appropriated to the department for payment
of court-ordered homeowner construction lien recovery fund
judgments entered before August 23, 2010. Subject to available
funds, the payment of final judgments must be made in the order in
which the final judgments were entered and began accruing interest.
(2) No later than September 30, the department shall transmit
a report to the standard report recipients that details the revenue
sources for the fund.
Sec. 509. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the bureau
of fire services, in accordance with the requirements under section
21c of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.21c, the
bureau shall perform or work in cooperation with local units of
government to perform inspections at places of public assembly that
pose the highest risk to occupants for injury or fatality based on
the size, density, or the nature of activities performed within the
facility.
Sec. 510. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for bureau of
survey and certification, the department shall submit a report
pertaining to bureau activities, including surveys and
investigations of nursing homes, hospitals, and acute continuing
care providers to the standard report recipients and the
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


chairpersons of the senate and house subcommittees with
jurisdiction over the budget for the department of health and human
services not later than March 30.

CANNABIS REGULATORY AGENCY
Sec. 601. Not later than January 31, the department shall
submit a comprehensive report to the standard report recipients for
all marihuana programs administered by the cannabis regulatory
agency. This report must include, but is not limited to, all of the
following information for the previous fiscal year regarding the
marihuana programs under the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008
IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, the medical marihuana facilities
licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, and the
Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL
333.27951 to 333.27967:
(a) The number of initial applications received, by license
category.
(b) The number of initial applications approved and the number
of initial applications denied, by license category.
(c) The average amount of time, from receipt to approval or
denial, to process an initial application, by license category.
(d) The number of renewal applications approved, by license
category and by county.
(e) The number of renewal applications received, by license
category and by county, if applicable.
(f) The number of renewal applications denied, by license
category and by county.
(g) The average amount of time, from receipt to approval or
denial, to process a renewal application, by license category, if
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


applicable.
(h) The percentage of initial applications not approved or
denied within the time requirements established in the respective
act, by license category, if applicable.
(i) The percentage of renewal applications not approved or
denied within the time requirements established in the respective
act, by license category, if applicable.
(j) The total amount collected from application fees or
established regulatory assessment and the specific fund the amount
is deposited into, by license category.
(k) The registered names and addresses of all facilities
licensed under each act, by license category and by county.
(l) The number of complaints received pertaining to each act,
by license type or regulatory activity.
(m) A description of the types of complaints received.
(n) A description of the process used to resolve complaints.
(o) The number of investigations opened pertaining to each
license category.
(p) The number of investigations closed pertaining to each
license category.
(q) The average amount of time to complete investigations
pertaining to each license category.
(r) The number of enforcement actions pertaining to each
license category.
(s) A description of the types of enforcement actions taken
against licensees.
(t) The number of administrative-hearing adjudications
pertaining to each license type.
(u) A list of the fees charged for license applications,
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


license renewals, and registry cards.
(v) The costs of administering the licensing program under
each act.
Sec. 602. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the cannabis
regulatory agency shall post on a publicly accessible website a
list of all of the following:
(a) The number of investigative reports that identify
violations of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL
333.26421 to 333.26430, the medical marihuana facilities licensing
act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, or the Michigan
Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951
to 333.27967, or violations of administrative rules promulgated
under the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421
to 333.26430, the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016
PA 281, MCL 333.27101 to 333.27801, or the Michigan Regulation and
Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967.
(b) The number of investigative reports that identify
suspected marihuana product that does not have the tracking numbers
assigned by the statewide monitoring system affixed, tagged, or
labeled as required by law.
(c) The number of complaints filed by the public with the
agency that concern either of the following:
(i) Marihuana product that does not have the tracking numbers
assigned by the statewide monitoring system affixed, tagged, or
labeled as required by law.
(ii) Unlicensed commercial production or sale of delta-8 THC.
(d) The number and outcome of all agency disciplinary
proceedings initiated against any licensee subject to the reports
or complaints in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(e) The number of reports the agency referred to the
department of state police or other appropriate law enforcement
agency.
(f) For any licensee subject to disciplinary proceedings
initiated by the agency:
(i) Name of the licensee.
(ii) Description of the allegation.
(iii) Complaint type.
(iv) Process used to resolve the allegation.
(v) Name of the law enforcement agency the allegation was
referred to, including the date of the referral.
(vi) Current license status on the day of the report and
whether or not the license was suspended, surrendered, or revoked.
(vii) Fines or other penalties issued.
(g) The number of licenses suspended, surrendered, or revoked.
Sec. 603. (1) Not later than January 31, the department shall
submit a comprehensive report to the standard report recipients for
all hemp programs administered by the cannabis regulatory agency.
The report must include, but is not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) The total amount of fees collected by the cannabis
regulatory agency from regulatory and licensing activities related
to hemp and hemp processor-handlers.
(b) The total cost of administering hemp regulatory and
licensing programs.
(c) The total number of hemp processor-handlers licensed in
this state, by county.
(d) A list and description of any fees that the cannabis
regulatory agency assesses on hemp processor-handler licensees.
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


(2) Not later than January 31, the department shall submit a
comprehensive report to the standard report recipients for all hemp
programs administered by the cannabis regulatory agency. The report
must include, but is not limited to, all of the following:
(a) The total amount of fees collected by the cannabis
regulatory agency from regulatory and licensing activities related
to hemp and hemp processor-handlers.
(b) The total cost of administering hemp regulatory and
licensing programs.
(c) The total number of hemp processor-handlers in this state,
by county.
(d) A list and description of any fees that the cannabis
regulatory agency assesses on hemp processor-handler licensees.
(e) The number of inspections conducted per year and the
result of each inspection.
(f) The number of hemp license applications and hemp license
approvals per year.

COMMISSIONS
Sec. 801. If Byrne formula grant funding is awarded to the
Michigan indigent defense commission created under section 5 of the
Michigan indigent defense commission act, 2013 PA 93, MCL 780.985,
the Michigan indigent defense commission may receive and expend
Byrne formula grant funds as an interdepartmental grant from the
department of state police. The Michigan indigent defense
commission may receive and expend federal grant funds from the
United States Department of Justice.
Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1, not later
than March 1, the Michigan indigent defense commission shall submit
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


a report to the standard report recipients on all of the following
information:
(a) The incremental costs associated with the standard
development process, the compliance plan process, and the
collection of data from all indigent defense systems and attorneys
providing indigent defense. The Michigan indigent defense
commission shall place particular emphasis on the costs that may be
avoided after standards are developed and compliance plans are in
place.
(b) A detailed explanation of the total cost calculation for
each indigent defense standard and juvenile indigent defense
standard for which grant recipients are receiving state grant
funding. This explanation must include a comprehensive itemization
of the types of costs included for each standard.
(c) An itemized listing of how much funding each grant
recipient is receiving for each indigent defense standard and
juvenile indigent defense standard.
(d) An explanation of the specific causal factors associated
with any increase or decrease of Michigan indigent defense
commission grant funding from the fiscal year 2023-2024 level.
Sec. 803. If Senate Bill No. 81 of the 103rd Legislature or
House Bill No. 4070 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted, then the
Michigan indigent defense commission shall utilize available
funding to begin the development and implementation of minimum
standards for youth defense services in accordance with the
Michigan indigent defense commission act, 2013 PA 93, MCL 780.981
to 780.1003.
Sec. 804. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan
indigent defense commission shall notify the standard report
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


recipients not more than 60 days after the adoption of any new
indigent defense standard. The notification must include an
estimated cost projection to fund the adopted indigent defense
standard for the initial and subsequent fiscal years.

GRANTS
Sec. 901. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
marihuana operation and oversight grants, the department shall
expend the funds for grants to counties for education and outreach
programs that relate to the Michigan medical marihuana program and
the adult-use marihuana program, in accordance with section 6(l) of
the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26426, and
section 14 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana
Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27964. The grant funds may be generated
from application and license fees authorized under section 8(1)(b)
of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL
1, MCL 333.27958. The grants must be distributed proportionately
based on the number of registry identification cards issued to or
renewed for the residents of each county that applied for a grant
under subsection (2). For the purposes of this subsection,
operation and oversight grants are for education, communication,
and outreach regarding the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL
1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430, and the Michigan Regulation and
Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967.
Grants provided under this section must not be used for law
enforcement purposes.
(2) Not later than December 1, the department shall post a
listing of potential grant funds available to each county on the
department's website. In addition, the department shall work
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


collaboratively with counties regarding the availability of the
grant funds. A county that requests grant funds shall apply on a
form developed by the department and available on the department's
website. The form must contain the county's specific projected plan
for use of the grant funds and its agreement to maintain all
records and to submit documentation to the department to support
the use of the grant funds.
(3) To be eligible to receive a grant under subsection (1), a
county shall apply not later than January 1 and submit a report to
the department not later than September 15 on how the grant was
expended. The department shall submit a report to the standard
report recipients not later than October 15 of the subsequent
fiscal year that details the grant amounts by recipient and the
reported uses of the grants in the previous fiscal year and details
the calculation for the amount for which each county was eligible.
Sec. 902. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for firefighter
training grants must be expended only for payments to counties to
reimburse organized fire departments for firefighter training and
other activities required under the firefighters training council
act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.361 to 29.377.
(2) If the funds appropriated in part 1 for firefighter
training grants are expended by the firefighters training council
created under section 3 of the firefighters training council act,
1966 PA 291, MCL 29.363, for payments to counties under section 14
of the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.374,
all of the following apply to the extent otherwise permissible by
law:
(a) The funds appropriated in part 1 for firefighter training
grants must be allocated in accordance with section 14(2) of the
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.374.
(b) If the funds allocated to any county under subdivision (a)
are less than $5,000.00, the funds allocated to each county under
subdivision (a) must be adjusted to provide for a minimum payment
of $5,000.00 to each county.
(3) Not later than February 1, the department shall submit a
financial report to the standard report recipients that identifies
all of the following information for the previous fiscal year:
(a) The amount of the payments that would be made to each
county if the distribution formula described in section 14(2) of
the firefighters training council act, 1966 PA 291, MCL 29.374,
would have been utilized to allocate the total amount appropriated
in part 1 for firefighter training grants.
(b) The amount of the payments approved by the firefighters
training council for allocation to each county.
(c) The amount of the payments actually expended or encumbered
within each county.
(d) A description of any other payments or expenditures made
under the authority of the firefighters training council.
(e) The amount of payments approved for allocations to
counties that was not expended or encumbered and lapsed back to the
fireworks safety fund.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 1001. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
bureau of fire services – smoke detectors, the bureau of fire
services shall purchase and distribute sealed-battery smoke
detectors to the residents of this state. The bureau of fire
services may purchase smoke detectors with additional capabilities
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


for individuals with physical or psychological conditions that
require an accommodative technology.
(2) Not later than September 30, the department shall submit a
report to the standard report recipients that contains all of the
following information:
(a) The number of smoke detectors that the bureau of fire
services purchased.
(b) The per-unit price that the bureau paid for the smoke
detectors.
(c) An itemized list of all cities, villages, or townships
that received smoke detectors and the number of smoke detectors
distributed to each city, village, or township.
Sec. 1002. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
Michigan Saves, the Michigan public service commission may award a
$500,000.00 grant to Michigan Saves to conduct a grant program for
clean energy improvement and on-site wastewater system replacement
or repair. Michigan Saves should grant funds to individuals within
the state who have a history of having difficulty obtaining
traditional capital or households with a combined income not
exceeding 300% of the federal poverty level and where businesses
indicate a state of financial need or vulnerability. The amount
granted to a single individual or business cannot exceed
$25,000.00.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan Saves,
the Michigan public service commission may award a $1,000,000.00
grant to a nonprofit green bank with experience in leveraging
energy-efficiency and renewable energy improvements, for the
purpose of making such loans more affordable for Michigan families,
businesses, and public entities. Grant funds may be used to support
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g


a loan loss reserve fund or other comparable financial instrument
to further leverage private investment in clean energy
improvements.
Sec. 1003. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for real
estate continuing education, the bureau of professional licensing
must expend the funds for grants to the Michigan Realtors
Association to approve and track real estate continuing education
in this state.
Sec. 1005. Funds appropriated in part 1 for urban search and
rescue must be distributed by the bureau of fire services to
support activities by the Michigan Task Force 1 in response to
emergencies and other situations that require technical rescue
expertise and equipment.
Sec. 1006. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
cannabis regulatory agency social equity program, the cannabis
regulatory agency shall further develop the program established
under section 8(1)(j) of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of
Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27958, with all of the following
goals:
(a) To encourage and increase participation in the social
equity program, with particular focus to promote and encourage
participation in the marihuana industry by people from communities
that have been disproportionately impacted by marihuana prohibition
and enforcement.
(b) To establish a minimum number of licensees that are
participating in the social equity program.
(c) To consider the area median income of a community in
designating communities that have been disproportionately impacted
by marihuana prohibition and enforcement.
Final Page
SCI S06112'26 (S-1) fci65g